District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.05

Employee rights.

Employees shall be protected against penalty or reprisal for reporting an unsafe or unhealthful working condition or practice, or assisting in the investigation of such condition or practice.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2005, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-621.5.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.5.